Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB739.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 138.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Before August 1, 2022, except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection
and subsection (3) of this section, an excise tax is imposed on all tracks
conducting pari-mutuel wagering on live racing under the jurisdiction of the
corporation as follows:
1. For each track with a daily average live handle of one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) or above, the tax shall be in the
amount of three and one-half percent (3.5%) of all money wagered on
live races at the track during the fiscal year; and
2. For each track with a daily average live handle under one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000), the tax shall be one and one-half
percent (1.5%) of all money wagered on live races at the track during
the fiscal year.
(b) Beginning August 1, 2022, the excise tax imposed on all tracks conducting
pari-mutuel wagering on live racing under jurisdiction of the corporation shall
be one and one-half percent (1.5%) of all money wagered on live races at the
track during the fiscal year.
(c) Beginning on April 1, 2014, an excise tax is imposed on all tracks conducting
pari-mutuel wagering on historical horse races under the jurisdiction of the
corporation at a rate of one and one-half percent (1.5%) of all money wagered
on historical horse races at the track during the fiscal year.
(d) Money shall be deducted from the tax paid under paragraphs (a), (b), and (c)
of this subsection and deposited as follows:
1. a. Before August 1, 2022, an amount equal to three-quarters of one
Page 1 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
percent (0.75%) of all money wagered on live races and historical
horse races at the track for Thoroughbred racing shall be deposited
in the Thoroughbred development fund established in KRS
230.400; and
b. Beginning August 1, 2022, an amount equal to three-quarters of
one percent (0.75%) of all money wagered on live races and
historical horse races at the track for Thoroughbred racing shall be
deposited in the Thoroughbred development fund established in
KRS 230.400 until forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) has
been deposited during a fiscal year, at which point the amount
deposited in the fund shall decrease to four-tenths of one percent
(0.4%) of all money wagered on live and historical horse races at
the track for Thoroughbred racing for the remainder of the fiscal
year;
2. a. Before August 1, 2022, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of all
money wagered on live races and historical horse races at the track
for harness racing shall be deposited in the Kentucky standardbred
development fund established in KRS 230.770. Beginning August
1, 2022, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of all money
wagered on live races at the track for harness racing shall be
deposited in the Kentucky standardbred development fund until a
total of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) has been deposited
during a fiscal year from this subparagraph, at which point the
amount deposited shall decrease to four-tenths of one percent
(0.4%) of all money wagered for the remainder of the fiscal year;
and
b. Beginning August 1, 2022, an amount equal to one percent (1%)
Page 2 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
of all money wagered on historical horse races at the track for
harness racing shall be distributed in the exact amounts based
upon contracts between the parties that have been filed with the
corporation, but at least one-half (1/2) of the funds shall be
deposited into the Kentucky standardbred development fund
established in KRS 230.770 until a total of twenty million dollars
($20,000,000) has been deposited into the Kentucky standardbred
development fund during a fiscal year from this subparagraph, at
which point the amount deposited in this subdivision shall
decrease to four-tenths of one percent (0.4%) of all money
wagered for the remainder of the fiscal year. The corporation shall
provide the department all information necessary from the
contracts in order for the funds in this subparagraph to be
distributed;
3. a. An amount equal to one percent (1%) of all money wagered on
live races and historical horse races at the track for paint horse,
Appaloosa, and Arabian horse racing shall be deposited in the
Kentucky paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian development fund
established by KRS 230.445; and
b. An amount equal to one percent (1%) of all money wagered on
live races and historical horse races at the track for quarter horse
racing shall be deposited in the Kentucky quarter horse
development fund established by KRS 230.405;
4. An amount equal to two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races at the track shall be paid
out in equal amounts as follows:
a. To the equine industry program trust and revolving fund
Page 3 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
established by KRS 230.550 to support the Equine Industry
Program at the University of Louisville, except that the amount
deposited from money wagered on historical horse races in any
fiscal year shall not exceed eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($850,000);
b. To the University of Kentucky for equine industry programs at the
university, except that the amount paid from money wagered on
historical horse races in any fiscal year shall not exceed four
hundred thousand dollars ($400,000);
c. To the Bluegrass Community and Technical College for the
provision of equine industry programs by the system, except that
the amount paid from money wagered on historical horse races in
any fiscal year shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000);
d. Amounts remaining from money wagered on historical horse races
in a fiscal year after payments are made in accordance with
subdivisions a., b., and c. of this subparagraph shall be distributed
in equal amounts to:
i. The Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation for the
benefit of Thoroughbred, standardbred, and American
quarter horse aftercare facilities in Kentucky, in an amount
not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
The Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation shall
serve as the administrative agent for these funds, and shall
distribute them annually to organizations engaged in the
accreditation and monitoring of aftercare facilities. Any
funds distributed under this subpart by the Kentucky Horse
Page 4 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
Racing and Gaming Corporation shall be awarded to
aftercare facilities based in Kentucky only after the facilities
have achieved and maintained levels of service and operation
that resulted in national accreditation; and
ii. The Kentucky equine management internship program for
equine management training, in an amount not to exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); and
e. Any amounts remaining from money wagered on historical horse
races in a fiscal year after payments are made in accordance with
subdivisions a., b., c., and d. of this subparagraph shall be paid to
the general fund;
5. a. An amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races at the track shall
be deposited in a trust and revolving fund to be used for the
construction, expansion, or renovation of facilities or the purchase
of equipment for equine programs at state universities and the
Bluegrass Community and Technical College, except that the
amount deposited from money wagered on historical horse races in
any fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($320,000).
b. These funds shall not be used for salaries or for operating funds
for teaching, research, or administration. Funds allocated under
this subparagraph shall not replace other funds for capital purposes
or operation of equine programs at state universities and the
Bluegrass Community and Technical College.
c. The Kentucky Council on Postsecondary Education shall serve as
the administrative agent for these funds, and shall establish an
Page 5 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
advisory committee of interested parties, including all universities
and the Bluegrass Community and Technical College with
established equine programs, to evaluate proposals and make
recommendations for the awarding of funds.
d. The Kentucky Council on Postsecondary Education may
promulgate administrative regulations to establish procedures for
administering the program and criteria for evaluating and awarding
grants;[ and]
6. An amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races shall be distributed to
the corporation to support equine drug testing as provided in KRS
230.265(3), except that the amount deposited from money wagered on
historical horse races in any fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred
twenty thousand dollars ($320,000); and
7. An amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races shall be distributed to
the pari-mutuel racing local government support fund created in
Section 2 of this Act.
(e) The excise tax imposed by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not
apply to pari-mutuel wagering on live harness racing at a county fair.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an excise tax is
imposed on:
1. All tracks conducting telephone account wagering;
2. All tracks participating as receiving tracks in intertrack wagering under
the jurisdiction of the corporation; and
3. All tracks participating as receiving tracks displaying simulcasts and
conducting interstate wagering thereon.
Page 6 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
(b) 1. Before August 1, 2022, the tax shall be three percent (3%) of all money
wagered on races as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection during
the fiscal year.
2. Beginning August 1, 2022, the tax shall be one and one-half percent
(1.5%) of all money wagered on races as provided in paragraph (a) of
this subsection during the fiscal year.
(c) A noncontiguous track facility approved by the corporation on or after
January 1, 1999, shall be exempt from the tax imposed under this subsection,
if the facility is established and operated by a licensed track which has a total
annual handle on live racing of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
or less. The amount of money exempted under this paragraph shall be retained
by the noncontiguous track facility, KRS 230.3771 and 230.378
notwithstanding.
(d) Money shall be deducted from the tax paid under paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection as follows:
1. An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the amount wagered shall be
deposited as follows:
a. In the Thoroughbred development fund established in KRS
230.400 if the host track is conducting a Thoroughbred race
meeting or the interstate wagering is conducted on a Thoroughbred
race meeting;
b. In the Kentucky standardbred development fund established in
KRS 230.770, if the host track is conducting a harness race
meeting or the interstate wagering is conducted on a harness race
meeting;
c. In the Kentucky paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian development
fund established by KRS 230.445, if the host track is conducting a
Page 7 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
paint horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian horse race meeting or the
interstate wagering is conducted on a paint horse, Appaloosa, or
Arabian horse race meeting; or
d. In the Kentucky quarter horse development fund established by
KRS 230.405, if the host track is conducting a quarter horse race
meeting or the interstate wagering is conducted on a quarter horse
race meeting;
2. An amount equal to twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) of
the amount wagered shall be allocated to the equine industry program
trust and revolving fund established by KRS 230.550 to be used to
support the Equine Industry Program at the University of Louisville;
3. An amount equal to one-twentieth of one percent (0.05%) of the amount
wagered shall be deposited in a trust and revolving fund to be used for
the construction, expansion, or renovation of facilities or the purchase of
equipment for equine programs at state universities, as detailed in
subsection (1)(d)5. of this section; and
4. An amount equal to one-twentieth of one percent (0.05%) of the amount
wagered shall be distributed to the corporation to support equine drug
testing as provided in KRS 230.265(3).
(3) If a host track in this state is the location for the conduct of a two (2) day
international horse racing event that distributes in excess of a total of twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) in purses and awards:
(a) The excise tax imposed by subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section shall not
apply to money wagered at the track on live races conducted at the track
during the two (2) day international horse racing event; and
(b) Amounts wagered at the track on live races conducted at the track during the
two (2) day international horse racing event shall not be included in
Page 8 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
calculating the daily average live handle for purposes of subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) If a host track in this state is the location for the conduct of an international harness
racing event spanning multiple days that distributes at least five million dollars
($5,000,000) in purses and awards, the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall be
granted a race title sponsorship and promotional package at the international
harness racing event with all usual and customary benefits assigned to promote
Kentucky tourism. The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall not be charged
any fees for the promotional package.
(5) The taxes imposed by this section shall be paid, collected, and administered as
provided in KRS 138.530.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 230 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The pari-mutuel racing local government support fund in the State Treasury is
hereby created and shall be:
(a) A trust and agency account administered by the Department for Local
Government in accordance with this section; and
(b) Disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the commissioner of
the Department for Local Government.
(2) This fund shall consist of moneys received in accordance with the distribution
formula established in Section 1 of this Act.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys remaining in the account at the close of
the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall carry forward into the succeeding fiscal
year.
(4) Moneys in the fund shall be used to support local governments where live and
historical horse racing facilities are located and as specified in subsections (5)
and (6) of this section.
Page 9 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
(5) The Department for Local Government shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that direct how local
governments may use moneys from this fund to address the social costs of
problem gambling, including but not limited to:
(a) Law enforcement retention;
(b) Homelessness;
(c) Affordable housing; and
(d) The policing, regulation, and administration of the facilities where live and
historical horse racing facilities are located.
(6) (a) The moneys in the fund shall be disbursed, at least quarterly, to counties
containing tracks or facilities that are paying the excise tax that ultimately
is deposited into the fund.
(b) The Department for Local Government shall:
1. Determine the amount of excise tax generated and paid by each track
or facility;
2. Determine the portion of the moneys in the fund related to that excise
tax; and
3. Distribute the tax to the appropriate county.
(7) The Department for Local Government shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A related to:
(a) The requirements for qualification for distribution of the moneys from this
fund to local governments, which shall include:
1. Application and reporting requirements for local governments;
2. A list of eligible expenses by the local governments; and
3. Accountability criteria for local governments to receive moneys; and
(b) Distributions to the local governments, which shall include guidelines for
the allocation of moneys for local governments which include both cities
Page 10 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
and counties.
(8) The Department of Revenue shall provide aggregate information to the
Department for Local Government pertaining to the location of the facilities, by
county and by city, in which pari-mutuel racing tax receipts are generated each
period, and other information as needed by the Department for Local
Government to perform the calculation in subsection (6) of this section.
(9) As used in this section, "local government" means a city, county, urban-county
government, charter county government, consolidated local government, and
unified local government.
Section 3. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or
former member of a county board of assessment appeals, present or former property
valuation administrator or employee, present or former secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the Revenue
Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect
or divulge any information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or
information regarding the tax schedules, returns, or reports required to be filed with
the department or other proper officer, or any information produced by a hearing or
investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the
person's business.
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of
property for taxation, or any other infraction of the tax laws;
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made
a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with
information respecting his or her own return;
Page 11 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department
in any court, or the introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the
department, in an action for violation of state or federal tax laws or in any
action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or
energy resources assessed under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land
under which the unmined minerals lie, factual information about the owner's
property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property, under
the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's
assessment. This information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential
basis, and the owner shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS
131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a
foreclosure action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, factual
information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or any
other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may
promulgate an administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the
provision of the information described in this paragraph. Any fee imposed
shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the information or
ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or
the Kentucky Supreme Court under KRS 131.1817;
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department
under KRS 138.210 to 138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is
necessary to administer the provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to
Page 12 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with
KRS 131.020(1)(b);[ or]
(l) Providing the information required in Section 2 of this Act to the
Department for Local Government on a confidential basis for the
calculation of the fund distribution in that section; or
(m) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building
materials used for disaster recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the
ENERGY STAR manufactured home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization
credit and the job assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting credits;
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer credit;
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production
credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account
Program credit;
Page 13 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for the
commercial mining of cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment credit;
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for a
qualified data center project; and
19. KRS 139.5325 for purposes of the sales and use tax incentive for a
qualifying attraction.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on
a confidential basis to the proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state,
any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other state, or the federal
government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive
similar or useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service
is for department use only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes.
Information received from the Internal Revenue Service shall not be made available
to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present
secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or
employee of the department, or any other person.
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax
requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as
reported to the department under the natural resources severance tax requirements
of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map
Page 14 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2106
submissions for the 1989 tax year, the department may make public or divulge only
those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to the department pursuant to
KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual
boundaries of mined-out parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps
required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not be construed to constitute land
surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereto.
Page 15 of 15
XXXX 2/18/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed